Illinois, session 104th, HB4953.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wholesale Drug Distribution Licensing Act 5is amended by changing Section 56 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 120/56)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 56. Restrictions on transactions.9    (a) A licensee shall receive prescription drug returns or 10exchanges from a pharmacy or other persons authorized to 11administer or dispense drugs or a chain pharmacy warehouse 12pursuant to the terms and conditions of the agreement between 13the wholesale distributor and the pharmacy or chain pharmacy 14warehouse. Returns of expired, damaged, recalled, or otherwise 15non-saleable pharmaceutical products shall be distributed by 16the receiving wholesale distributor only to either the 17original manufacturer or a third party returns processor. 18Returns or exchanges of prescription drugs, saleable or 19otherwise, including any redistribution by a receiving 20wholesaler, shall not be subject to the pedigree requirements 21of Section 57 of this Act, so long as they are exempt from the 22pedigree requirement of the FDA's currently applicable 23Prescription Drug Marketing Act guidance. Both licensees under   HB4953 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19403 AAS 32851 b1this Act and pharmacies or other persons authorized to 2administer or dispense drugs shall be accountable for 3administering their returns process and ensuring that the 4aspects of this operation are secure and do not permit the 5entry of adulterated and counterfeit product.6    (b) A manufacturer or wholesale distributor licensed under 7this Act may furnish prescription drugs only to a person 8licensed by the appropriate state licensing authorities. 9Before furnishing prescription drugs to a person not known to 10the manufacturer or wholesale distributor, the manufacturer or 11wholesale distributor must affirmatively verify that the 12person is legally authorized to receive the prescription drugs 13by contacting the appropriate state licensing authorities.14    (c) Prescription drugs furnished by a manufacturer or 15wholesale distributor licensed under this Act may be delivered 16only to the business address of a licensee, to the premises 17listed on a the license, or, if the Department has received 18notice that a licensee has authorized a health care entity to 19receive the prescription drugs, to the address of a health 20care entity, provided that the manufacturer or wholesale 21distributor may furnish prescription drugs to an authorized 22person or agent of that person at the premises of the 23manufacturer or wholesale distributor if:24        (1) the identity and authorization of the recipient is 25    properly established; and26        (2) this method of receipt is employed only to meet   HB4953 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19403 AAS 32851 b1    the immediate needs of a particular patient of the 2    authorized person.3    Prescription drugs that are controlled substances 4furnished by a manufacturer or wholesale distributor licensed 5under this Act may be delivered only to a registered place of 6business or professional practice, as required by Section 302 7of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 8    For the purposes of this subsection (c), "health care 9entity" means an entity where medical, dental, or veterinary 10services are provided by a licensed practitioner and where the 11licensed practitioner is responsible for the receipt, storage, 12and use of drugs. 13    (d) Prescription drugs may be furnished to a hospital 14pharmacy receiving area, provided that a pharmacist or 15authorized receiving personnel signs, at the time of delivery, 16a receipt showing the type and quantity of the prescription 17drug received. Any discrepancy between the receipt and the 18type and quantity of the prescription drug actually received 19shall be reported to the delivering manufacturer or wholesale 20distributor by the next business day after the delivery to the 21pharmacy receiving area.22    (e) A manufacturer or wholesale distributor licensed under 23this Act may not accept payment for, or allow the use of, a 24person or entity's credit to establish an account for the 25purchase of prescription drugs from any person other than the 26owner of record, the chief executive officer, or the chief   HB4953 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19403 AAS 32851 b1financial officer listed on the license of a person or entity 2legally authorized to receive the prescription drugs. Any 3account established for the purchase of prescription drugs 4must bear the name of the licensee. This subsection (e) shall 5not be construed to prohibit a pharmacy or chain pharmacy 6warehouse from receiving prescription drugs if payment for the 7prescription drugs is processed through the pharmacy's or 8chain pharmacy warehouse's contractual drug manufacturer or 9wholesale distributor. 10(Source: P.A. 95-689, eff. 10-29-07.)